District of Columbia statutes.
8-1010

Repealed

Multi-material recycling buy-back centers and intermediate processing facilities.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 11, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3410.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-263, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2333).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-86, March 19, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1636).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-346, December 22, 1992, 40 DCR 141).
For temporary amendments of section, see § 2(c) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Emergency Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-147, November 4, 1993, 40 DCR 8091) and § 2(c) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-185, February 2, 1994, 41 DCR 627).
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-226, the “D.C. Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-160, July 20, 1989.